Utah statutes.
19-3-306.   Information and findings required for approval by the department.

The department may not issue a construction and operating license unless information in the application:

(1)  demonstrates the availability and adequacy of emergency services, including medical, security, and fire response, and environmental cleanup capabilities both at and in the region of the proposed site and for areas involved in the transport of wastes within the state;

(2)  establishes financial assurance for operation and closure of the facility and for responding to emergency conditions in transportation and at the facility as required by department rules, including proof the applicant:

(a)  possesses substantial resources that are sufficient to respond to any reasonably foreseeable injury or loss resulting from operation of the facility; and

(b)  will maintain these resources throughout the term of the facility;

(3)  provides evidence the wastes will not cause or contribute to an increase in mortality, an increase in illness, or pose a present or potential hazard to human health or the environment;

(4)  provides evidence the personnel employed at the facility have appropriate and sufficient education and training for the safe and adequate handling of the wastes;

(5)  demonstrates the public benefits of the proposed facility, including the lack of other available sites or methods for the management of the waste that would be less detrimental to the public health or safety or to the quality of the environment;

(6)  demonstrates the technical feasibility of the proposed waste management technology;

(7)  demonstrates conformance with federal laws, regulations, and guidelines for a waste facility;

(8)  demonstrates conclusively that any facility is temporary and provides identified plans and alternatives for closure of the facility with an enforceable schedule and identified dates for closure, including evidence that:

(a)  an identified party has irrevocably agreed to accept the waste at the end of the temporary storage period; and

(b)  the waste will be moved to another facility;

(9)  demonstrates that:

(a)  the applicant is not a limited liability company, limited partnership, or other entity with limited liability; and

(b)  the applicant and its officers and directors and those principals or other entities that are participating in and associated with the applicant regarding the facility are willing to accept unlimited strict liability, consistent with federal law, for any financial losses or human losses or injuries resulting from operation of any proposed facility;

(10)  provides evidence the applicant has posted a cash bond in the amount of at least two billion dollars or in a greater amount as determined by department rule to be necessary to adequately respond to any reasonably foreseeable releases or losses, or the closure of the facility;

(11)  provides evidence the applicant and its officers and directors, the owners or entities responsible for the generation of the waste, principals, and any other entities participating in or associated with the applicant, including landowners, lessors, and contractors, consent in writing to the jurisdiction of the state courts of Utah for any claims, damages, private rights of action, state enforcement actions, or other proceedings relating to the construction, operation, and compliance of the proposed facility; and

(12)  demonstrates that any person or entity which sends wastes to a facility shall remain the owner of and responsible for the waste and its ultimate disposal and is willing to accept unlimited, strict liability, consistent with federal law, for any financial or human losses, liabilities, or injuries resulting from the wastes for the entire time period the waste is at the facility.



Enacted by Chapter 348, 1998 General Session

